Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.005

Department created—Powers and duties.

(1) The department of enterprise services is created as an executive branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under chapter 43, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

(2) In addition to the powers and duties as provided in chapter 43, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess., the department shall provide products and services to support state agencies, and may enter into agreements with any other governmental entity or a public benefit nonprofit organization, in compliance with RCW 39.34.055, to furnish such products and services as deemed appropriate by both parties. The agreement shall provide for the reimbursement to the department of the reasonable cost of the products and services furnished. All governmental entities of this state may enter into such agreements, unless otherwise prohibited.

[ 2012 c 224 s 25; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 103.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 224: See RCW 39.26.900.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.